Utah statutes.
9-4-306.   Powers.
The impact board may:
(1)  appoint, where it considers this appropriate, a hearing examiner or
administrative law judge with authority to conduct any hearings, make
determinations, and enter appropriate findings of facts, conclusions of law,
and orders under authority of the impact board under Sections 11-13-306 and
11-13-307;
(2)  appoint additional professional and administrative staff necessary to
effectuate Sections 11-13-306 and 11-13-307;
(3)  make independent studies regarding matters submitted to it under Sections
11-13-306 and 11-13-307 that the impact board, in its discretion, considers
necessary, which studies shall be made a part of the record and may be
considered in the impact board's determination; and
(4)  make rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act
it considers necessary to perform its responsibilities under Sections
11-13-306 and 11-13-307.
